Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-390
Applicability of sections.

Sections 28-391 to 28-394 do not apply to an act or conduct causing or contributing to the death of an unborn child when the act or conduct is:

(1) Committed or engaged in by the mother of the unborn child;

(2) Any medical procedure performed with the consent of the mother; or

(3) Dispensing a drug or device in accordance with law or administering a drug or device prescribed in accordance with law.

Laws 2002, LB 824, § 4.